Illinois, session 104th, HB5222.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5adding Section 9-401 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/9-401 new)7    Sec. 9-401. Failure to pay for lodging.8    (a) Definitions. As used in this Act:9        (1) "Hotel" has the same meaning as used in the Hotel 10    Operators' Occupation Tax Act.11        (2) "Operator" means the owner, manager, or authorized 12    agent in charge of a hotel.13        (3) "Occupant" means any person who rents, uses, or 14    occupies a room or unit in a hotel for any period of time.15        (4) "Bona fide lease agreement" means a written 16    agreement between a hotel and an occupant executed by both 17    parties that expressly grants a right of residential 18    tenancy under Illinois law for a fixed or periodic term 19    and specifies rent, term length, and notice provisions 20    consistent with the Landlord and Tenant Act.21        (5) "Emergency housing program" means any temporary 22    lodging arrangement paid for directly or indirectly by a 23    federal, State, or local government agency, including, but   HB5222- 2 -LRB104 18558 JRC 32001 b1    not limited to, emergency shelter, disaster relief, 2    transitional housing, or prevention programs for the 3    unhoused.4    (b) Elements of trespassing. Except as provided in 5subsections (f) and (g), an occupant of a hotel who fails to 6pay the full amount of lodging charges when due and who remains 7on the premises without the consent of the operator is a 8trespasser and not a tenant. Upon written notice to vacate 9issued by the operator, the occupant has no lawful right to 10remain in possession of the premises and may be removed under 11subsection (h). Nothing in this subsection may be construed to 12affect the rights or remedies of an occupant who is a tenant 13under a bona fide lease agreement governed by Illinois 14landlord-tenant law.15    (c) Safe harbor for operators. An operator or employee of 16the operator acting in good faith and in substantial 17compliance with this Section may not be civilly or criminally 18liable for requesting law-enforcement assistance or for the 19peaceful removal of a nonpaying occupant.20    An operator acts in substantial compliance under this 21Section if, before requesting removal, the operator:22        (1) made a reasonable effort to collect payment, 23    including presenting an itemized invoice or folio;24        (2) provided written notice to vacate stating the 25    reason for termination of occupancy; and26        (3) retained written or electronic documentation   HB5222- 3 -LRB104 18558 JRC 32001 b1    showing nonpayment, declined payment authorization, or 2    unauthorized continued occupancy.3    This safe harbor does not extend to acts of willful 4misconduct or the unlawful removal of an occupant covered by a 5bona fide lease agreement or emergency housing program.6    (d) Government-funded emergency housing. This Section does 7not apply to any occupant placed in a hotel under a 8government-funded emergency, disaster-relief, or transitional 9housing program if:10        (1) the cost of lodging is paid for, directly or 11    indirectly, by a federal, State, or local agency; and12        (2) the lodging agreement or agency contract expressly 13    specifies the occupant's temporary stay and removal 14    procedures.15    These occupants retain only the rights and protections 16defined by the applicable government program agreement and are 17not tenants unless the agreement expressly creates a 18residential tenancy.19    (e) Protection for tenants with bona fide lease 20agreements. Nothing in this Section may be construed to limit, 21impair, or abridge the rights of any tenant occupying a hotel 22room under a bona fide lease agreement. These tenants may be 23removed only through judicial proceedings under Article IX of 24this Code or other applicable law and are entitled to all 25notices, protections, and legal remedies given to residential 26tenants.  HB5222- 4 -LRB104 18558 JRC 32001 b1    (f) Law-enforcement assistance. Upon verification of the 2operator's documentation under subsection (e), a peace officer 3may remove the nonpaying occupant as a trespasser.4    If the occupant refuses to vacate after lawful notice, the 5officer may arrest the person for criminal trespass to real 6property under Section 21-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012.7    Nothing in this Section requires law enforcement to 8intervene in a bona fide lease dispute or a matter in which the 9occupant's payment status is genuinely contested.10    (g) Preservation of other remedies. An operator may pursue 11civil remedies for unpaid charges, damages to property, or 12breach of contract. A tenant with a bona fide lease agreement 13retains all rights and defenses available under Illinois law.14    (h) Rules and guidance. The Illinois Law Enforcement 15Training and Standards Board may adopt model policies and 16training materials for law-enforcement agencies and operators 17regarding the application of this Section.18    (i) Construction. This Section is to be liberally 19construed to protect law-abiding hotel operators from unlawful 20occupancy and to preserve the rights of occupants with bona 21fide lease agreements or government-funded housing placements.